Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Interstate Adult Offender Supervision
439.562.
Kentucky Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision — Membership — Meetings — Reimbursement — Administrative regulations.

To oversee the intrastate affairs of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, the Kentucky Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision is created and attached to the Office of the Secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The membership of the council shall consist of:

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections, ex officio;

The compact administrator of the Department of Corrections, ex officio;

The deputy commissioner of the Office of Community Services and Facilities, ex officio;

One (1) member of the House of Representatives selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member of the Senate selected by the President of the Senate and appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) members of the judiciary selected by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court and appointed by the Governor; and

Six (6) at-large members, appointed by the Governor, representing victim groups and other community interest groups.

Of the initial members, except those serving ex officio, three (3) members shall be appointed to serve terms of four (4) years, three (3) members shall be appointed to terms of three (3) years, three (3) members shall be appointed to terms of two (2) years, and one (1) member shall be appointed to a term of one (1) year. Thereafter, members shall be appointed to terms of four (4) years or until their successors have been duly appointed and qualified. Members may be reappointed and vacancies shall be immediately filled, in like manner, for the unexpired term.

The Kentucky Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision shall meet at least annually, at the call of the chair, and shall:

Advocate when seeking resources;

Provide recommendations regarding operational improvements;

Provide recommendations regarding dispute resolution;

Provide recommendations regarding training needs;

Provide recommendations regarding policy changes; and

Serve as a support mechanism for the Kentucky Compact Office.

The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the council as chairperson and one (1) member as vice chairperson, and a member so designated shall serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the Governor or until his or her term expires.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties, subject to Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Department of Corrections may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to administer the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 473, § 2, effective June 19, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 72, § 7, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/19/2002). Under 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 273, sec. 4, this section “takes effect the later of July 1, 2001, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, in substantially the form set out in [KRS

439.561

], by no less than thirty-five states, as that term is defined in [KRS

439.561

].” On June 19, 2002, the thirty-fifth state enacted the compact, and this section took effect.

439.563.
Restitution as condition of parole — Board order — Effect on length of parole.

When there is an identified victim of a defendant’s crime to whom restitution has been ordered but not yet paid in full, or restitution has been ordered paid to a government agency and has not yet been paid in full, the Parole Board shall order the defendant to pay restitution as a condition of parole.

When the Parole Board orders restitution, the board shall:

Order the restitution to be paid to a specific person or organization through the Division of Probation and Parole, which shall disburse the moneys as ordered by the board;

Set the amount of restitution to be paid, if not already set;

Set the amount and frequency of each restitution payment or require the payment to be made in a lump sum.

When the Parole Board orders restitution, the Department of Probation and Parole shall:

Monitor and oversee the collection of the restitution;

Institute parole violation proceedings if the restitution is not being paid;

Institute sanctions against the defendant if restitution is not being paid and good cause is not shown for the nonpayment; and

Maintain parole supervision over the defendant until restitution has been paid in full.

The board, in addition to any other sanctions which may be imposed on the defendant, may ask a court to hold a defendant who is not paying restitution in the manner or amount prescribed in contempt of court.

Any statute relating to the length of parole supervision notwithstanding, the parole for a person owing restitution shall be until the restitution is paid in full, even if this would lengthen the period of supervision beyond the statutory limit of parole supervision or the statutory limit for serving out the sentence imposed.

Payment of restitution in full prior to the end of the period of parole supervision shall not shorten the period of parole supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 47, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 345, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 94, § 6, effective July 15, 2014.

439.570.
Persons accepted for supervision under compact subject to arrest and detention — Notice to sending state — Applicability of supervision fee and of drug testing and substance abuse treatment fee.

All persons accepted for supervision under the terms of the interstate compact as set forth in KRS

439.560

shall be subject to arrest or detention by a probation or parole officer under the same circumstances as Kentucky probationers or parolees. The probation or parole officer shall immediately notify the sending state through the interstate compact of the arrest or detention of the person in question, setting forth the reasons for the arrest or detention.

All persons accepted for supervision under the terms of the interstate compact as set forth in KRS

439.560

shall be subject to the payment of a supervision fee as established in KRS

439.315

and the payment of a drug testing and substance abuse treatment fee as conditions of supervision imposed by the Division of Probation and Parole. Failure to pay the required supervision fee or drug testing and substance abuse treatment fee is grounds for the termination of supervision or shall subject the person to the initiation of revocation proceedings under the same circumstances as set forth in KRS

439.315

. For purposes of implementing KRS 439.315, the Division of Probation and Parole shall be the releasing authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 77, § 1; 1994, ch. 418, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

439.575.
Prerelease probation of inmates program.

There is hereby created a program for prerelease probation of inmates confined in correctional facilities under the jurisdiction of or under contract to the Department of Corrections.

Any inmate who is in a prerelease program or eligible for a prerelease program as specified by administrative regulations of the Department of Corrections may apply to the sentencing court for prerelease probation.

The court, upon favorable recommendation of the Department of Corrections, may place the inmate on probation under those terms and conditions the court deems necessary, which may include but not need to be limited to those specified in KRS

533.030

.

In particular, the court may require that an inmate placed on prerelease probation remain in a halfway house approved by the Department of Corrections and that the probationer pay the cost of his or her lodging in the halfway house and the costs of probation supervision in accordance with applicable statutes for probation supervision and persons granted work release from jail. Costs for lodging in a halfway house or other facility approved, but not operated, by the Department of Corrections shall be paid by the defendant directly to the halfway house or other facility at the rate specified by court order or by the Department of Corrections.

An inmate placed on prerelease probation shall no longer be considered as an inmate of the Department of Corrections but shall be considered as a defendant placed on probation, subject to supervision by the Division of Probation and Parole, or other agency approved by the court, and the orders of the court.

A person placed on prerelease probation by the court who violates the conditions of his or her probation may be dealt with by the court in the same manner as any other person who violates the conditions of probation.

The period of probation under this section shall not exceed the maximum expiration date of the inmate applying for the probation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 119, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 183, § 27, effective August 1, 2002.